DI-34

DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DI31T-02

DTC

19 (2) | Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor Circuit
Malfunction (IDL Switch/Range Malfunction)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC 19 (1) (Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Open/Short)) on page DI-27.

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

19(2)

Condition (a) or (b) continue 0.5 sec. or more:
(@)IDLONandVA> 1.4V
(b)IDLONandVAS> 1.4V

Condition (a) or (b) continue 0.5 sec. or more: » Openorshortinaccelerator pedal position sensor circuit
(a)IDLOFFandVA<0.6V * Accelerator pedal position sensor

(b) IDL OFF and VAS < 0.6 V *Engine ECLL

Conditions (a) and (b) continue 0.05 sec. or more:
(@ 0.6V<VA<44Vand06V<VAS<44V
(b)VA -VAS>0.5V

WIRING DIAGRAM

Refer to DTC 19 (1) (Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Open/Short)) on page DI-27.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
Whenusinghand -heldtester

1 Connectthehand -heldtester,readthelDL signal.

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand

CHECK:

Read the IDL signal.

—held tester main switch ON.

OK:
Accelerator pedal IDL signal
Fully open OFF
Fully closed ON
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FI17052
OK> Go to step 4.
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2 | Check voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of engine ECU.
ON DL PREPARATION:
@ E2C (@) Remove the glove compartment door.
( ) (b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
{ 000000000008 A000000 ﬁunmﬁnmuﬁﬁﬂ CHECK:
'IDDDDDDDDDUUD%M%M Measure voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of engine
OK:
BEG653 Accelerator pedal Voltage
Pesses A04949 Fully closed 9-14V
Fully open 0-3V

(See page IN-19).

0K> Check and replace engine ECU

@

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (IDL line) (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair harness or connector.

@

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

Connect the hand-held tester, read the accelerator pedal operating percentage
(See page DI-27 , Step 1).

OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI-4).
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5 | Check voltage between terminal VCC of wire harness side connector and body
ground (See page DI-27, Step 2).

NG> Go to step 8.

OK
~_—

6 | Check voltage between terminals VA, VAS and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI-27, Step 3).

(See page IN-19).

0K> Check and replace engine ECU

e ]

7 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (VA, VAS line) (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair harness or connector.

@

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

8 | Check voltage between terminals VCC and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI-27, Step 5).

(See page IN-19).

NG> Check and replace engine ECU

@

Check for open in harness and connecter between engine ECU and accelerator pedal position
sensor (VCC line) (See page IN-19).
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When not using hand-held tester

1 Check voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of engine ECU.

ON

@ E2C

7

IDL

lroooootooooon|poooooo DO0000000
(0000000000000)00000000|00y#00|00000000000

NN

BE6653
P23864

A04949

B

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the glove compartment door.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Measure voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of engine
ECU.

OK:
Accelerator pedal Voltage
Fully closed 9-14V
Fully open 0-3V

0K> Go to step 3.

2 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (IDL line) (See page IN-19).

@

NG> Repair harness or connector.

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

3 | Check voltage between terminal 4 of wire harness side connector and body-
ground (See page DI-27, Step 2).
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NG> Go to step 6.
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4 | Check voltage between terminals VA, VAS and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI-27, Step 3).

(See page IN-19).

OK> Check and replace engine ECU

B

5 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (VA, VAS line) (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair harness or connector.

@

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

6 [ Check voltage between terminals VCC and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI-27, Step 5).

(See page IN-19).

NG> Check and replace engine ECU

3

Check for open in harness and connector between engine ECU and accelerator pedal position
sensor (VCC line) (See page IN-19).
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